Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-349
Legislative intent.

The
Legislature recognizes the need for the investigation and provision of services
to certain persons who are substantially impaired and are unable to protect
themselves from abuse, neglect,
or exploitation. Often such persons cannot find others able or
willing to render assistance. The Legislature intends through the Adult Protective
Services Act to establish a program designed to fill this need and to assure
the availability of the program to all eligible persons. It is also the intent
of the Legislature to authorize the least restriction possible on the exercise
of personal and civil rights consistent with the person's need for services.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 2.

A public policy exception to the employment-at-will doctrine applies to allow a cause of action for retaliatory discharge when an employee is fired for making a report of abuse as mandated by the Adult Protective Services Act. Wendeln v. Beatrice Manor, 271 Neb. 373, 712 N.W.2d 226 (2006).